North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 2. Juvenile Services. [Repealed]

§ 110-21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1339, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the North Carolina Juvenile Code, see

G.S. 7B-100

et seq.

§ 110-21.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 1.

§ 110-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to conditional release and revocation of conditional release of juveniles, see now

G.S. 7B-906.1

, 7B-2514 and 7B-2516.

§ 110-22.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 1.

§ 110-23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 1999.

§ 110-23.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the North Carolina Juvenile Code, see

G.S. 7B-100

et seq.

§ 110-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to the requirements for taking juveniles into custody, see now

G.S. 7B-500

et seq. and

G.S. 7B-1900

et seq.

§ 110-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 1.

§ 110-25.1.
[Repealed]

Transferred to § 130-58.1 by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 3.

§§ 110-26 through 110-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 1.

§ 110-39.
[Repealed]

Transferred to § 14-316.1 by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 4.

§§ 110-40 through 110-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 911, s. 1.